dictsource/sv_rules
.group p
        p          p
        p (p 
        pion       pI;'u:n
        påstå      po:sto:
        paket      pak'e:t
        parentes   paR@nt,e:s
        privat     pRIvA:t
        potatis    pOt'A:tIs

.group q
        q          k
        q (q 
        qu         kw

.group r
        r          R
	r) r 
        rd         d.
        rd (s      d.
        rn         n.
        rl         l.
        rt         t.
        rs         s.

        rsi (o     Rsx'
        rsk        s.k
        rsk (i     Rsx
        rss        s.
        rg (_      Rj
        radera     Rad'e:Ra
        rediger    R%EdIsx'e:R
        rafik      Raf'i:k
        regel      Re:gEl
        resor      R'e:sOR
        rekord     REk'o:Rd
        risk       RIsk
        rubrik     R8bR'i:k

.group s
        s          s
        ss         s
        sch        sx
        sj         sx
        sk (e      sx
        sk (i      sx
	s (kig    s
	sk (y      sx
        sk (ä      sx
        sk (ö      sx
    fi) s (k       s
    fu) s (k       s
        skj        sx
        stj        sx
        sio (n     sx'u:
        ssio (n    sx'u:
        skype      sk'ajp
        spegel     spe:gEl
        segel      se:gEl
        spel       spe:l
        select     _^_EN
        säg        sEj
        service    sY:Rvi:s
        spara      spA:Ra
        sjack      sjak
        svara      svA:Ra
        slog       sl'u:g
        stått      stOt
        sverige    svERjE
        säkerhet   s'E:k@Rh,e:t
        skärm      sx'ERm
        segla      se:gla
        skolor     sku:lOR
        snegla     sne:gla
        spegla     spe:gla
        semest     sEm'Est
     _) sionist    si:o:n'Ist
     _) sh         sx
        sweden     _^_EN
        samhäll    s'amhEl

.group t
        t          t
        tt         t
        tt (A      t:        // ??
        ti (on     sx'
        tj         S;
    &C) te (_S2    tE        // ??
        task       _^_EN
        talsyntes  t'A:lsynt,e:s
        tabell     tab'El
        tagit      t'A:gIt
        tangent    tanjEnt
        teknik     tEkn'i:k
     _) tion       sx'u:n
        tions      sx'u:ns

.group u
        u          u-
        u (tb      u-
        u (tf      u-
        u (tg      u-
        u (ts      u-
        u (tr      u-
        u (tv      u-
   dat) u (m       8
        u (CC      8
        u (n       8
        u (tl      u-
    sj) u (k       u-
     j) u (ni      u-
     j) u (l       u-
     r) u (m_      8:
        utmärk     'u-tm@Rk
     b) u (tik     8
     v) u (x       8
   lin) u (x       %8
        uppge      8pje:
        u (tn      u-
        u (tr      u-
        u (ng      8
        u (nkC     %8
        u (kti     %8
        upload     _^_EN

.group v
        v          v
        v (v 
        vali       valI
        varandra   vaRandRa
        varn       vA:Rn
        varan      vA:Ran
        verk       vERk
        verktyg    vERkty:g

.group w
        w          v
        window     _^_EN
        wise       _^_EN
        wire       _^_EN

.group x
        x          ks
        x (x 

.group y
        y          y:
        y (CC      y
     t) y (d       'y:
     s) y (s       %y
     t) y (g       'y:
     s) y (nska    y:

.group z
        z          s
        zz         z

.group å
        å          o:
        å (CC      o:
        å (C%      O
        å (ng      O
    tr) å (d       'o:
     l) å (s       'o:
     l) å (ss      'O
     v) å (r       'o:
     r) å (k       o:
     h) å (r       'o:
     m) å (l       o:
     n) å (l       o:
    sk) å (l       o:
     h) å (l       o:
     h) å (ll      O
     

.group ä
        ä          E:
        ä (CC      E
        ä (r       E:
  ion) ä (r       'E:
     t) ä (r       'E:  
        ä (rd      E:
    tr) ä (d       E:
     v) ä (lk      E:
     l) ä (sn      E:
     v) ä (rd      E:
    sk) ä (rg      E:
     l) ä (st      E:
     n) ä (tt      E

     v) ä (x       E
     n) ä (t       E:
     f) ä (rd      E:
     b) ä (r       E:
     r) ä (k       E:
        ärl (d     'E:R
    ff) ä	'E:


.group ö
        ö          Y:
        ö (CC      'W
     f) ö (rd      'Y:
     f) ö (rk      %W
     l) ö (sn      'Y:
     l) ö (st      'Y:
        ö (vr      'Y:
     r) ö (m       'W
     ff) ö          'Y:


.group
        é          'e:


        %          pROs'Ent
        $          d'OlaR
        +          pl8s
        &          _:'Ok
        @          sn'A:bElA:

// Swedish tone accent rules (basic version)
// Compound words typically get accent 2 (grave)
        vardagsrum     v'A:Rdagsru-m   // compound word - accent 2
        köksfönster    S'Y:ksfY:nstER  // compound word - accent 2  
        badrum         b'A:dru-m       // compound word - accent 2
        sovrum         s'o:vru-m       // compound word - accent 2
        sjukhus        sx'u-khus       // compound word - accent 2
        /          sn'e:dstREk
        €          'EvRu:


        .          p'8Nt
        . (.       _:
    \.) . 

    __) - (_D      m'i:n8s
    A_) - (_D      _
    C_) - (_D      _
    --) - 

        *          sx'E:Rna
     *) * (* 
** 
    **) * (_       _::

// === Phase 13: Prosody - suffix rules ===
// Common Swedish suffixes for improved word splitting

.group
// -ighet suffix (common abstract noun ending)
        ighet (_   Ig,e:t
        igheten    Ig,e:tEn
        igheter    Ig,e:tER

// -else suffix
        elsen (_   ElsEn
        elser (_   ElsER

// -ande/-ende suffix (present participle / gerund)
        ande (_    andE
        ende (_    EndE
